Tennessee, session 114, HB1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-504(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(b)
(1) Except as provided by subdivision (b)(2), aggravated sexual battery is
a Class B felony.
(2) Aggravated sexual battery is a Class A felony if the victim was less
than eighteen (18) years of age or was mentally defective, mentally
incapacitated, or physically helpless.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1352
001476
- 1 -